New Jersey, session 222, A875.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Gross income shall not include amounts received as basic pay by residents who are members of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard for service in active duty or active duty for training, as those terms are used in N.J.S.38A:1-1. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable income years beginning on or after January 1 next following the date of enactment.